Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4151.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin AIR TRAFFIC CONTROL TOWER BASE BUILDING; DULUTH AIRPORT AUTHORITY.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $4,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of transportation for a grant to the Duluth Airport Authority to design, construct, furnish, and equip a new air traffic control tower base building to include office spaces, office support spaces, equipment rooms, workspaces, and logistic support spaces at the Duluth International Airport. This project includes site and associated site support area preparation, including demolition of obsolete buildings, construction and installation of utilities and stormwater retention system, and existing fuel tank replacement. A portion of this appropriation shall be used as a match to federal funding for the project. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $4,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end